Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2223
Designated broker; professional corporation.

A designated
broker as defined in section 81-885.01 may be organized as a professional
corporation under the Nebraska Professional Corporation Act.

Laws 2011, LB315, § 3.